District of Columbia statutes.
46-305.05

Penalties for noncompliance.

An employer who willfully fails to comply with an income-withholding order issued by another state and received for enforcement is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a tribunal of the District.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 505
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(i), 45 DCR 2924

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-345.5.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2875).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151), and § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-131: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 46-301.01.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 505 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).